New York, session 2025-2026, S7918.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 3246 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3246. Reimbursement for anesthesia services. (a) An insurer issuing 4 a policy of hospital, medical, or surgical expense insurance pursuant to 5 this section or any other section of law shall not impose arbitrary time 6 caps on reimbursement for anesthesia services provided during medically 7 necessary procedures. 8 (b) Reimbursement for anesthesia services shall be determined based on 9 medical necessity as determined by the insurer, taking into consider- 10 ation the complexity of the procedure as evidenced by the submission of 11 medical records submitted by the attending anesthesiologist or licensed 12 anesthesia provider. 13 (c) (1) An insurer issuing a policy of hospital, medical, or surgical 14 expense insurance pursuant to this section or any other section of law 15 shall be prohibited from denying payment for anesthesia services solely 16 because the duration of care exceeded a pre-set time limit. 17 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph one of this subsection, an insurer may 18 use a time related reimbursement methodology for anesthesia services if 19 such methodology is based upon criteria established by an independent 20 organization, including the criteria used by the centers for Medicare 21 and Medicaid services to reimburse anesthesia services under title XVIII 22 of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare). If an insurer uses 23 a time related reimbursement methodology, it should have an established EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09176-03-5 S. 7918--A 2 1 process for the submission of additional medical records and the sharing 2 of electronic medical records to assess whether an increase to the 3 reimbursement is warranted. 4 § 2. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 4331 to read 5 as follows: 6 § 4331. Reimbursement for anesthesia services. (a) Every corporation 7 subject to the provisions of this article that provide hospital, 8 medical, or surgical expense insurance coverage shall not impose arbi- 9 trary time caps on reimbursement for anesthesia services provided during 10 medically necessary procedures. 11 (b) Reimbursement for anesthesia services shall be determined based on 12 medical necessity as determined by the corporation, taking into consid- 13 eration the complexity of the procedure as evidenced by the submission 14 of medical records submitted by the attending anesthesiologist or 15 licensed anesthesia provider. 16 (c)(1) A corporation issuing hospital, medical, or surgical expense 17 insurance coverage shall be prohibited from denying payment for anes- 18 thesia services solely because the duration of care exceeded a pre-set 19 time limit. 20 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph one of this subsection, a corporation 21 may use a time related reimbursement methodology for anesthesia services 22 if such methodology is based upon criteria established by an independent 23 organization, including the criteria used by the centers for Medicare 24 and Medicaid services to reimburse anesthesia services under title XVIII 25 of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare). If a corporation 26 uses a time related reimbursement methodology, it should have an estab- 27 lished process for the submission of additional medical records and the 28 sharing of electronic medical records to assess whether an increase to 29 the reimbursement is warranted. 30 § 3. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 365-q 31 to read as follows: 32 § 365-q. Reimbursement for anesthesia services. 1. Any medical assist- 33 ance provider whose medical assistance includes the provision of anes- 34 thesia, including such assistance furnished through a managed care 35 program, shall not be subject to arbitrary time caps on reimbursement 36 when furnished during medically necessary procedures, and such payment 37 shall not be denied for such assistance solely because the duration of 38 such assistance exceeded a pre-set time limit. 39 2. Notwithstanding subdivision one of this section, a managed care 40 provider may use a time related reimbursement methodology for anesthesia 41 services if such methodology is based upon criteria established by an 42 independent organization, including the criteria used by the centers for 43 Medicare and Medicaid services to reimburse anesthesia services under 44 title XVIII of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare). If a 45 managed care provider uses a time related reimbursement methodology, it 46 should have an established process for the submission of additional 47 medical records and the sharing of electronic medical records to assess 48 whether an increase to the reimbursement is warranted. 49 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026.